Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.120

Hearing of application for benefits—Appeal to state board.

The local board shall initially hear and decide all applications for relief or retirement pensions under this chapter, subject to review by, or appeal by the proper person to, the state board where decision on such review or appeal shall be final and conclusive.

[ 1999 c 148 s 11; 1969 c 118 s 3; 1955 c 263 s 10; 1945 c 261 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-27. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 2; RRS s 9578-2.]